trunk/apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	<pardef n="вл/езе__vblex"><!-- perf perf"/><s n="iv -->
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ез</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езте</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>яза</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езеш</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езе</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езем</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR"> 	   <p>          <l>еземе</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езете</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язат</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>езех</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езеше</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езеше</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езехме</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езехте</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езеха</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>езел</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езела</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езело</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езели</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>язох</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езе</l>           <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езе</l>           <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язохме</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язохте</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язоха</l>         <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>язъл</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езлия</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езлият</l>       <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язла</l>       <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язлата</l>     <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язло</l>          <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язлото</l>        <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езли</l>       <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>езлите</l>     <r>езе<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>




	<!-- 1 спрежение, аорист на -ОХ -->
	<!-- свършен вид (без сег.деят.прич) и деепричастие
							съкратена основа в мин.св. деят. прич
							преходен
							-->

<e lm="влезе"><i>вл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="излезе"><i>изл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="възлезе"><i>възл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="произлезе"><i>произл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="навлезе"><i>навл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="понавлезе"><i>понавл</i><par n="вл/езе__vblex"/></e>
